Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1694.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIX-JTAX AMNESTY PROGRAM FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026Section 2901-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Amnesty period." The time period of 90 consecutive days established by the Governor ending no later than June 30, 2026."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Eligible tax." As follows:(1) A tax administered by the department under this act that became delinquent during a taxable period.(2) The term includes any interest, penalty or fee on an eligible tax.(3) For an unknown liability, the term only includes taxes due during a taxable period.(4) For purposes of taxes collected under the International Fuel Tax Agreement, the term applies only to taxes, interest and penalties owed to the Commonwealth, not to other states or Canadian provinces."Program." The tax amnesty program established under section 2902-J as provided for in this article."Taxable period." A taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019, and ending no later than December 31, 2024."Taxpayer." As follows:(1) A person, association, fiduciary, partnership, corporation or other entity required to pay or collect any of the eligible taxes.(2) The term does not include a taxpayer that:(i) prior to the amnesty period, has received notice that the taxpayer is the subject of a criminal investigation for an alleged violation of any law imposing an eligible tax;(ii) prior to the amnesty period, has been named as a defendant in a criminal complaint alleging a violation of any law imposing an eligible tax; or20250HB1694PN2084 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) is a defendant in a pending criminal action for an alleged violation of any law imposing an eligible tax."Unknown liability." A liability for an eligible tax for which:(1) a return or report has not been filed, a payment has not been made and the taxpayer has not been contacted by the department concerning the unfiled returns or reports or unpaid tax; or(2) a return or report has been filed, the tax was underreported and the taxpayer has not been contacted by the department concerning the underreported tax and is not already under audit when the amnesty period begins.Section 2902-J. Establishment of program.(a) Establishment and administration.--Subject to sections 2902-F(c) and 2902-G(c), a tax amnesty program is established and shall be administered by the department.(b) Applicability.--Subject to sections 2902-F(c) and 2902-G(c), the program shall apply to a taxpayer that became delinquent on payment of a liability for an eligible tax during a taxable period, including a liability for returns not filed, liabilities according to records of the department during a taxable period, liabilities not reported, underreported or not established, but delinquent during a taxable period.(c) Future amnesty program participation.--A taxpayer that participates in the program shall not be eligible to participate in a future tax amnesty program.(d) Deferred payment plan agreement.--An existing deferred payment plan agreement between a taxpayer and the department where the agreement applies to a tax liability for which amnesty 20250HB1694PN2084 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is sought by the taxpayer for amounts remaining on the tax liability, the taxpayer, as a condition of receiving amnesty, shall pay the liability, notwithstanding terms of the agreement to the contrary, in full during the amnesty period.Section 2903-J. Required payment.(a) Taxpayer requirements.--Subject to section 2904-J, each taxpayer that participates in the program shall comply with all of the following:(1) During the amnesty period:(i) File a tax amnesty return, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, which contains the information that the department requires. A tax amnesty return shall be considered to be timely filed if, during the amnesty period, the tax amnesty return is postmarked or filed electronically or otherwise.(ii) Make payment of all taxes due to the Commonwealth in accordance with the tax amnesty return that is filed. The taxpayer shall not be required to pay any penalty, interest or fee applicable to an eligible tax.(2) As applicable, file:(i) Complete tax returns for all required years for which the taxpayer previously has not filed a tax return.(ii) Complete amended tax returns for all required years for which the taxpayer underreported eligible tax liability.(b) Prohibitions.--(1) The department may not collect any penalty, interest or fee waived under subsection (a)(2).(2) Except as otherwise provided in this article, the 20250HB1694PN2084 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may not pursue administrative or judicial proceeding against a taxpayer with respect to an eligible tax that is disclosed on a tax amnesty return.(c) Refund.--A taxpayer shall not be owed a refund under this article.Section 2904-J. Amnesty contingent on continued compliance.The department may assess and collect from a taxpayer granted amnesty under this article all penalties and interest waived through the program if, within two years after the end of the program, either of the following occurs:(1) The taxpayer:(i) becomes delinquent for three consecutive periods in payment of taxes due or filing of returns required on a semimonthly, monthly, quarterly or other basis; and(ii) has not contested the tax liability through a timely valid administrative or judicial appeal.(2) The taxpayer:(i) becomes delinquent and is eight or more months late in payment of taxes due or filing of returns on an annual basis; and(ii) has not contested the tax liability through a timely valid administrative or judicial appeal.Section 2905-J. Limitation of deficiency assessment.If, subsequent to the amnesty period, the department issues a deficiency assessment with respect to a tax amnesty return, the department may impose penalties and pursue a criminal action only with respect to the difference between the amount shown on that tax amnesty return and the current amount of tax.Section 2906-J. Overpayment of tax.If an overpayment of eligible tax is refunded or credited 20250HB1694PN2084 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within 180 days after the tax amnesty return is filed or the eligible tax is paid, whichever is later, interest shall not be allowed on the overpayment.Section 2907-J. Previously paid interest and penalties.A refund or credit shall not be allowed for any interest or penalty on eligible taxes paid to the department prior to the amnesty period.Section 2908-J. Proceedings relating to tax amnesty return barred.Participation in the program shall be conditioned upon the taxpayer's agreement that the right to protest or pursue an administrative or judicial proceeding with regard to tax amnesty returns filed under the program or to claim a refund of money paid under the program is barred.Section 2909-J. Undisclosed liabilities.Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit the department from instituting civil or criminal proceedings against a taxpayer with respect to an amount of tax that is not disclosed on the tax amnesty return or an amount disclosed on the amnesty return that is not paid.Section 2910-J. Duties of department.(a) Guidelines.--(1) The department shall develop guidelines to implement and administer the provisions of this article.(2) Within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall transmit notice of the development of the guidelines under this subsection to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin, which must contain the following:20250HB1694PN2084 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) An explanation of the program and the requirements for eligibility for the program.(ii) The dates during which a tax amnesty return may be filed.(iii) A specimen copy of the tax amnesty return.(iv) The amnesty revenue estimates required under section 2912-J(b).(b) Publicity.--The department shall publicize the program to maximize public awareness of and participation in the program. The department shall coordinate to the highest degree possible its publicity efforts and other actions taken to implement this article.(c) Reports.--The department shall issue reports to the General Assembly detailing program implementation. The reports shall contain the following information:(1) Within 30 days after the end of the amnesty period:(i) A detailed breakdown of the department's administrative costs in implementing the program.(ii) The total dollar amount of revenue collected under the program.(2) Within 180 days after the end of the amnesty period:(i) The number of tax amnesty returns filed and a breakdown of the number and dollar amount of revenue raised for each tax by calendar year during which the tax period ended. In addition, the gross revenues shall be broken down in the following categories:(A) Amounts represented by assessments receivable established by the department on or before the first day of the amnesty period.(B) All other amounts.20250HB1694PN2084 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The total dollar amount of penalties, interest and fees waived under the program.(iii) The demographic characteristics of tax amnesty participants, including North American Industry Classification System codes of participants, type of taxpayer, consisting of individual, partnership, corporation or other entity, size of tax liability and geographical location.(d) Notification.--The department shall notify in writing each known tax delinquent, at the last known valid address of the taxpayer, of the existence of the program. The sole purpose of the letter sent by the department to the taxpayer shall be notification of the program.Section 2911-J. Method of payment.All tax payments under the program shall be made by certified check, money order, electronic transfer, credit card or other financial instrument acceptable to the department.Section 2912-J. Use of revenue.(a) Restricted revenue account.--(1) All revenue generated by this article shall be deposited into a restricted revenue account in the General Fund.(2) Revenue from the restricted revenue account shall be distributed as follows:(i) All money from General Fund sources shall be deposited in the General Fund no later than June 30, 2026, less repayment of any costs for administration of the program to the department.(ii) All revenue from Motor License Fund sources shall be deposited in the Motor License Fund no later 20250HB1694PN2084 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than June 30, 2026.(iii) All revenue from Liquid Fuels Tax Fund sources shall be deposited in the Liquid Fuels Tax Fund no later than June 30, 2026.(b) Revenue estimates.--(1) The department shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin:(i) A separate amnesty revenue estimate for revenue generated under this article from the following sources:(A) The General Fund.(B) The Motor License Fund.(C) The Liquid Fuels Tax Fund.(ii) The methodology used to develop the estimate.(2) All amnesty revenue estimates shall be submitted for publication in accordance with section 2910-J(a)(2)(iv).Section 2913-J. Additional penalty.(a) General rule.--Subject to the limitations provided under subsection (b), a penalty of 5% of the unpaid tax liability and penalties and interest shall be levied against a taxpayer subject to an eligible tax if the taxpayer failed to remit an eligible tax due or had an unreported or underreported liability for an eligible tax on or after the first day following the end of the amnesty period.(b) Nonapplicability.--The penalty provided in this section shall not apply to a taxpayer that:(1) pays the liability in full or entered into a duly approved and executed deferred payment plan on or before the last day of the amnesty period; or(2) has filed a timely and valid administrative or 20250HB1694PN2084 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judicial appeal contesting the liability on or before the last day of the amnesty period.(c) Penalty in addition.--The penalty provided by this section shall be in addition to other penalties provided by law.Section 2914-J. Construction.Except as expressly provided in this article, this article shall not:(1) Be construed to relieve a person, corporation or other entity from the filing of a return or from a tax, penalty or interest imposed by the provisions of any law.(2) Affect or terminate a petition, investigation, prosecution, legal or otherwise, or other proceeding pending under the provisions of any law.(3) Prevent the commencement or further prosecution of a proceeding by the proper authorities of the Commonwealth for violation of any law or for the assessment, settlement, collection or recovery of tax, penalty or interest due to the Commonwealth under any law.Section 2915-J. Suspension of inconsistent acts.All acts or parts of acts inconsistent with the provisions of this article are suspended to the extent necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1694PN2084 - 10 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223